North Carolina statutes. Chapter 35B. Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act.
Article 5. Miscellaneous Provisions.

§ 35B-45.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History.

2016-72, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2016-72, s. 1 enacted this section as

G.S. 35B-22

. It has been renumbered as this section at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

Session Laws 2016-72, s. 3, provides: “Nothing in this act shall be construed to otherwise affect the requirements for seeking an ancillary guardianship under

G.S. 35A-1280

or for petitioning the court for the removal of personalty from the State under

G.S. 35A-1281

.”

Session Laws 2016-72, s. 4, provides: “This act becomes effective December 1, 2016, and applies to multistate guardianship and protective proceedings initiated on or after that date. Articles 1, 3, and 4 of Chapter 35B of the General Statutes, as enacted by Section 1 of this act, and

G.S. 35B-22

and

G.S. 35B-23

[now

G.S. 35B-45

and

G.S. 35B-46

], as enacted by Section 1 of this act, apply to proceedings initiated prior to December 1, 2016, regardless of whether an incompetency, guardianship, or protective order has been issued.”

§ 35B-46.
Relation to electronic signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This Chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001, et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. § 7003(b).

History.

2016-72, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2016-72, s. 3, provides: “Nothing in this act shall be construed to otherwise affect the requirements for seeking an ancillary guardianship under

G.S. 35A-1280

or for petitioning the court for the removal of personalty from the State under

G.S. 35A-1281

.”

Session Laws 2016-72, s. 4, provides: “This act becomes effective December 1, 2016, and applies to multistate guardianship and protective proceedings initiated on or after that date. Articles 1, 3, and 4 of Chapter 35B of the General Statutes, as enacted by Section 1 of this act, and

G.S. 35B-22

and

G.S. 35B-23

[now

G.S. 35B-45

and

G.S. 35B-46

], as enacted by Section 1 of this act, apply to proceedings initiated prior to December 1, 2016, regardless of whether an incompetency, guardianship, or protective order has been issued.”